Utah statutes.
9-4-1301.   Assistance to domestic violence shelters -- Rulemaking
authority.
(1)  The Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human
Services has statutory responsibility to provide violence services, including
temporary shelter, to victims of domestic violence pursuant to the provisions
of Sections 62A-4a-101 and 62A-4a-105.  The division may assist the Division
of Child and Family Services by providing for the development, construction,
and improvement of shelters for victims of domestic violence, as described in
Section 77-36-1, through loans and grants to nonprofit and governmental
entities.
(2)  No later than July 1, 2001, the division shall, in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules establishing:
(a)  procedures for applying for loans and grants;
(b)  criteria for awarding loans and grants; and
(c)  requirements for the repayment of loans.
(3)  The division may appoint an advisory panel to:
(a)  assist the division in developing rules under Subsection (2); and
(b)  recommend how available funds should be disbursed.
(4)  The division shall make loans and grants with monies specifically
appropriated for that purpose.
(5)  The division shall coordinate with the Division of Child and Family
Services in complying with the provisions of this section.
